it: sede di montaggio della telecamera di retromarcia: Bullone targa; Cornice targa; Paraurti posteriore - a incasso; Paraurti posteriore - a superficie; Portellone/porta posteriore; Supporto ruota di scorta; Maniglia portellone; Supporto terza luce di stop; Maniglia bagagliaio; Supporto a staffa universale; Altro
es: Ubicación de montaje de la cámara de respaldo: Perno de la placa de matrícula; Marco de la placa de matrícula; Parachoques trasero (montaje al ras); Parachoques trasero (montaje en superficie); Escotilla/puerta trasera; Montaje de rueda de repuesto; Manija del portón trasero; Montaje de tercera luz de freno; Manija del maletero; Montaje de soporte universal; Otro
el: Καθορίζει τη θέση τοποθέτησης της κάμερας οπισθοπορείας, επηρεάζοντας το πεδίο ορατότητας και την κάλυψη της εικόνας: Βίδα πινακίδας; Πλαίσιο πινακίδας; Πίσω προφυλακτήρας - χωνευτή βάση; Πίσω προφυλακτήρας - επιφανειακή βάση; Πίσω πόρτα/πόρτα χώρου αποσκευών; Βάση ρεζέρβας; Λαβή πίσω πόρτας; Βάση τρίτου φρένου; Λαβή πορτμπαγκάζ; Βάση στήριξης γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
pl: Miejsce montażu kamery cofania: Śruba tablicy rejestracyjnej; Ramka tablicy rejestracyjnej; Tylny zderzak – montaż wpuszczany; Tylny zderzak – montaż na powierzchni; Tylna klapa/drzwi; Uchwyt koła zapasowego; Klamka tylnej klapy; Uchwyt trzeciego światła stop; Klamka bagażnika; Uniwersalny uchwyt; Inne
nb: Sikkerhetskopi kameramontering sted: Nummerskiltbolt; Nummerskiltramme; Bakfanger – innfelt montering; Bakfanger – overflatemontering; Bakluke/bakdør; Reservehjulfeste; Baklukehendel; Feste for tredje bremselys; Bagasjeromshåndtak; Universelt brakettfeste; Annet
fr: Position de montage de la caméra de recul: Boulon de plaque d’immatriculation; Support de plaque d’immatriculation; Pare-chocs arrière - montage encastré; Pare-chocs arrière - montage en surface; Hayon/porte arrière; Support de roue de secours; Poignée de hayon; Support de troisième feu stop; Poignée de coffre; Support de montage universel; Autre
ko: 후방 카메라 장착 위치: 번호판 볼트; 번호판 프레임; 리어 범퍼 - 플러시 마운트; 리어 범퍼 - 서피스 마운트; 리어 해치/도어; 스페어타이어 마운트; 테일게이트 핸들; 보조 제동등 마운트; 트렁크 핸들; 범용 브래킷 마운트; 기타
th: ตำแหน่งติดตั้งกล้องมองหลัง: น็อตป้ายทะเบียน; กรอบป้ายทะเบียน; กันชนหลัง - ติดตั้งแบบฝัง; กันชนหลัง - ติดตั้งบนพื้นผิว; ประตูท้าย; จุดยึดยางอะไหล่; มือจับประตูท้ายรถกระบะ; จุดยึดไฟเบรกดวงที่สาม; มือจับฝากระโปรงท้าย; ขายึดอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Mesto namestitve kamere za vzvratno vožnjo: Vijak registrske tablice; Okvir registrske tablice; Zadnji odbijač – poravnana pritrditev; Zadnji odbijač – površinska pritrditev; Zadnja vrata; Nosilec rezervnega kolesa; Ročaj prtljažnih vrat; Nosilec tretje zavorne luči; Ročaj prtljažnika; Univerzalna pritrditev z nosilcem; Drugo
da: Back-up-kameras monteringslokation: Bolt til registreringsskilt; Ramme til registreringsskilt; Bagkofanger – planmonteret; Bagkofanger – overflademonteret; Bagklap/bagdør; Montering på reservehjul; Håndtag på bagklap; Montering på tredje bremselygte; Håndtag på bagagerum; Universalbeslag; Andet
cs: Místo montáže couvací kamery: Šroub registrační značky; Rámeček registrační značky; Zadní nárazník – zápustná montáž; Zadní nárazník – povrchová montáž; Zadní dveře; Držák rezervního kola; Klika zadních dveří; Držák třetího brzdového světla; Klika kufru; Univerzální držák; Jiné
pt-BR: Local de montagem da câmera de ré: Parafuso da placa de licença; Moldura da placa de licença; Para-choque traseiro - embutido; Para-choque traseiro - sobreposto; Porta-malas/porta traseira; Suporte do estepe; Maçaneta da porta traseira; Suporte da terceira luz de freio; Maçaneta do porta-malas; Suporte universal; Outro
sv: Extra monteringsplats för kamera: Bult för registreringsskylt; Hållare för registreringsskylt; Bakre stötfångare – infälld; Bakre stötfångare – utanpåliggande; Baklucka/bakdörr; Reservhjulshållare; Bakluckehandtag; Hållare för tredje bromsljus; Bagageluckehandtag; Universellt fäste; Övrigt
ru: Место установки камеры заднего вида: Болт номерного знака; Рамка номерного знака; Задний бампер — врезная установка; Задний бампер — накладная установка; Задняя дверь/крышка багажника; Крепление на запасное колесо; Ручка заднего борта; Крепление на дополнительный стоп-сигнал; Ручка багажника; Универсальный кронштейн; Другое
sk-SK: Miesto upevnenia parkovacej kamery: Skrutka evidenčného čísla; Rám evidenčného čísla; Zadný nárazník – zapustená montáž; Zadný nárazník – povrchová montáž; Zadné dvere; Držiak rezervného kolesa; Rukoväť zadných výklopných dverí; Držiak tretieho brzdového svetla; Rukoväť kufra; Montáž na univerzálnu konzolu; Iné
lt-LT: Atsarginės kameros montavimo vieta: Valstybinio numerio varžtas; Valstybinio numerio rėmelis; Galinis buferis – įleidžiama; Galinis buferis – paviršinė; Galinės durys / dangtis; Atsarginio rato laikiklis; Bagažinės dangčio rankena; Trečiojo stabdžių žibinto laikiklis; Bagažinės rankena; Universalus laikiklis; Kita
vi: Vị trí lắp đặt camera lùi: Ốc vít biển số; Khung biển số; Cản sau - lắp chìm; Cản sau - lắp nổi; Cửa cốp/cửa sau; Giá gắn lốp dự phòng; Tay nắm cốp sau; Giá gắn đèn phanh thứ ba; Tay nắm cốp xe; Giá đỡ đa năng; Khác
zh-TW: 倒車攝影機安裝位置: 車牌螺栓; 車牌框; 後保險桿 (嵌入式); 後保險桿 (外掛式); 後車廂蓋/車門; 備胎底座; 尾門把手; 第三煞車燈底座; 後車廂把手; 通用支架底座; 其他
nl: Achteruitrijcamera montagelocatie: Kentekenplaatbout; Kentekenplaathouder; Achterbumper - inbouw; Achterbumper - opbouw; Achterklep/deur; Reservewielhouder; Achterklephandgreep; Derde remlicht-houder; Kofferbakhandgreep; Universele beugelbevestiging; Overig
ja: バックカメラ取り付け位置: ライセンスプレートボルト; ライセンスプレートフレーム; リアバンパー - フラッシュマウント; リアバンパー - サーフェスマウント; リアハッチ/ドア; スペアタイヤマウント; テールゲートハンドル; サードブレーキランプマウント; トランクハンドル; 汎用ブラケットマウント; その他
tr: Geri görüş kamerası montaj konum: Plaka cıvatası; Plaka çerçevesi; Arka tampon - gömme montaj; Arka tampon - yüzeye montaj; Arka bagaj kapağı/kapı; Yedek lastik montajı; Bagaj kapağı kolu; Üçüncü fren lambası montajı; Bagaj kolu; Evrensel braket montajı; Diğer
de: Montageort der Rückfahrkamera: Kennzeichenschraube; Kennzeichenhalterung; Heckstoßstange – bündige Montage; Heckstoßstange – Aufbaumontage; Heckklappe/-tür; Reserveradhalterung; Heckklappengriff; Dritte Bremsleuchte; Kofferraumgriff; Universelle Halterung; Sonstige
hr-HR: Lokacija za postavljanje kamere za vožnju unatrag: Vijak registarske pločice; Okvir registarske pločice; Stražnji branik – ugradbena; Stražnji branik – nadgradna; Stražnja vrata / prtljažnik; Nosač rezervne gume; Ručka vrata prtljažnika; Nosač trećeg stop svjetla; Ručka prtljažnika; Univerzalni nosač; Ostalo
ro-RO: Locație de montare pentru camera de rezervă: Șurub pentru plăcuța de înmatriculare; Suport pentru plăcuța de înmatriculare; Bara spate - montare la nivel; Bara spate - montare pe suprafață; Haion/Ușă spate; Suport pentru roata de rezervă; Mâner haion; Suport pentru a treia lampă de frână; Mâner portbagaj; Suport de prindere universal; Altele
bg-BG: Място за монтаж на камерата за задно виждане: Болт на регистрационната табела; Рамка на регистрационната табела; Задна броня – скрит монтаж; Задна броня – повърхностен монтаж; Заден капак/врата; Монтаж на резервната гума; Дръжка на задната врата; Монтаж на третия стоп; Дръжка на багажника; Монтаж с универсална скоба; Друго
zh-CN: 倒车摄像头安装位置: 牌照螺栓; 牌照框; 后保险杠 - 嵌入式安装; 后保险杠 - 表面安装; 后舱门/车门; 备胎安装架; 尾门把手; 第三刹车灯安装架; 后备箱把手; 通用支架安装; 其他
hu: Biztonsági mentési kamera szerelési helyszíne: Rendszámtábla csavarja; Rendszámtábla kerete; Hátsó lökhárító – süllyesztett; Hátsó lökhárító – felületi; Csomagtérajtó; Pótkeréktartó; Csomagtérajtó fogantyúja; Harmadik féklámpa; Csomagtartó fogantyúja; Univerzális konzol; Egyéb
fi: Peruutuskameran asennuspaikka: Rekisterikilven pultti; Rekisterikilven kehys; Takapuskuri – uppoasennus; Takapuskuri – pinta-asennus; Takaluukku/takaovi; Vararenkaan teline; Takaluukun kahva; Kolmannen jarruvalon teline; Tavaratilan kahva; Yleiskäyttöinen kiinnikeasennus; Muu
pt-PT: Localização de montagem da câmara de marcha-atrás: Parafuso da matrícula; Moldura da matrícula; Para-choques traseiro, montagem embutida; Para-choques traseiro, montagem à superfície; Porta-bagagens/porta traseira; Suporte para pneu sobresselente; Puxador da porta da bagageira; Suporte para terceira luz de travão; Puxador da bagageira; Montagem com suporte universal; Outro
en: Backup camera mounting location: License plate bolt; License plate frame; Rear bumper - flush mount; Rear bumper - surface mount; Rear hatch/door; Spare tire mount; Tailgate handle; Third brake light mount; Trunk handle; Universal bracket mount; Other